Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1757.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 275.025, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Low-aid municipality distribution. new text end new text begin (a) A low-aid municipality is eligible for a distribution from the proceeds of the state general levy imposed on taxpayers within the municipality in the amount provided under paragraph (b). For the purposes of this subdivision, a low-aid municipality is any municipality that for the taxes payable year: new text end new text begin (1) lies wholly or partially within the area as defined under section 473F.02, subdivision 2; new text end new text begin (2) does not receive a municipal state-aid street fund distribution under section 162.13; new text end new text begin (3) does not receive a local government aid distribution under sections 477A.011 to 477A.03; new text end new text begin (4) has a fiscal disparities contribution tax capacity that exceeds the municipality's fiscal disparities distribution tax capacity; new text end new text begin (5) has a population of less than 5,000; and new text end new text begin (6) is located in Anoka County. new text end new text begin (b) The distribution under this subdivision is equal to: (1) the municipality's net tax capacity tax rate; multiplied by (2) the municipality's net fiscal disparities contribution. The distribution under this subdivision may not exceed the tax under this section imposed on taxpayers within the municipality. The amount of the distribution to each municipality must be determined by the commissioner of revenue and certified to each affected municipality and county by September 1 of the year in which taxes are payable. new text end new text begin (c) The distribution under this subdivision must be paid to the qualifying municipality by the treasurer of the home county of the municipality by December 1 of the year the taxes are payable. The amounts distributed under this subdivision must be deducted from the settlement of the state general levy for the taxes payable year under section 276.112. new text end new text begin (d) For purposes of this subdivision, the following terms have the meanings given: new text end new text begin (1) "municipality" means a home rule or statutory city or a town; and new text end new text begin (2) "net fiscal disparities contribution" means a municipality's fiscal disparities contribution net tax capacity minus the municipality's distribution net tax capacity. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective beginning with property taxes payable in 2026 and thereafter. new text end